Virginia statutes. Title 52. Police (State).
Chapter 1. Department of State Police.

§ 52-1.
Establishment of Department headed by Superintendent; Bureau of Criminal Investigation and division of drug law enforcement and investigation within Department.

There is hereby established as a separate department, a Department of State Police headed by the Superintendent of State Police. There shall be established within the Department of State Police, in addition to any other divisions or bureaus that may be established by statute or otherwise, a Bureau of Criminal Investigation and a division for drug law enforcement and investigation.

History.

1942, p. 340; Michie Code 1942, § 585(71a); R. P. 1948, §

52-1

; 1974, c. 483; 1980, c. 232; 2000, cc. 560, 600.

Cross references.

For statutes on a retirement system for State police officers, see §§

51.1-200

through

51.1-210

.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendments by cc. 560 and 600 are identical, and added “and a division for drug law enforcement and investigation” at the end of the second sentence.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

“Indian country.” —

Pamunkey Indian reservation does not qualify as “Indian country” for federal purposes, despite federal recognition of the Pamunkey Tribe. Nor does the Mattaponi Indian reservation qualify as “Indian country” for federal purposes, where there has not been federal recognition of that tribe. Thus, Virginia state and local law-enforcement agencies retain the same authority on the Pamunkey and Mattaponi Indian reservations as elsewhere in the Commonwealth to serve legal process, arrest warrants, and subpoenas, and to investigate misdemeanors and felonies. See opinion of Attorney General to Colonel W.S. Flaherty, Superintendent, Department of State Police, 15-049, 2016 Va. AG LEXIS 9 (6/3/16).

§ 52-2.
Appointment of Superintendent and term of office.

The Superintendent of State Police shall be appointed by the Governor, subject to confirmation by the General Assembly if in session when such appointment is made, and if not in session, then at its next succeeding session. Such officer shall hold his office at the pleasure of the Governor for a term coincident with that of each Governor making the appointment, or until his successor shall be appointed and qualified. Vacancies shall be filled for the unexpired term in the same manner as original appointments are made.

History.

1942, p. 340; Michie Code 1942, § 585(71a); R. P. 1948, §

52-2

.

§ 52-3.
Oath, bond, and salary of Superintendent.

The Superintendent of State Police, before entering upon the discharge of his duties, shall take an oath that he will faithfully and impartially discharge and perform all the duties of his office and shall be bonded in accordance with §

2.2-1840

. The Superintendent shall receive such salary as may be appropriated for the purpose.

History.

1942, p. 340; Michie Code 1942, § 585(71a); R. P. 1948, §

52-3

; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 152.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 152, effective July 1, 2021, in the first sentence, substituted “be bonded in accordance with §

2.2-1840

” for “give bond in such penalty as may be fixed by the Governor, conditioned upon the faithful discharge of his duties, the premium on such bond to be paid out of the funds available for the maintenance and operation of his office” and made a stylistic change.

§ 52-4.
Functions of Department.

The highway patrol, or state police patrol as it is sometimes called, the police school, the state police radio or communication system, the supervision of inspection stations and of inspectors of motor vehicles, the promotion of highway safety, the establishment and direction of a vehicle accident prevention and safety program for state agencies, the adoption of standards for motor vehicle appliances, accessories and safety devices and the registration of machine guns shall be in the Department of State Police.

History.

1942, p. 340; Michie Code 1942, § 585(71a); 1948, p. 419; R.P. 1948, §

52-4

; 1980, c. 469; 1986, c. 228; 1988, c. 806; 1989, c. 18.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1997, c. 483, cl. 1 provides: “The Department of Motor Vehicles and the Department of State Police, in conjunction with the Department of Information Technology [now the Virginia Information Technologies Agency], shall work together toward using bar code technology, as well as all other types of emerging technology, to improve the operation of the agencies whenever feasible and effective.”

§ 52-4.1.
Repealed by Acts 1968, c. 722.

§ 52-4.2.
Department of Motor Vehicles to publish statistical information, and conduct research and experiments; copies to be furnished by Department to Commonwealth’s attorneys.

The Department of Motor Vehicles shall tabulate and analyze all accident reports and shall publish annually, or more frequently, statistical information based thereon as to the number and circumstances of traffic accidents.

Based upon its findings, after analysis, the Department may conduct further necessary detailed research to determine more fully the cause, control and prevention of highway accidents. It may further conduct experimental field tests within areas of the Commonwealth from time to time to prove the practicability of various ideas advanced in traffic control and accident prevention.

The Department of Motor Vehicles shall promptly furnish a copy of any particular accident report or a proof of financial responsibility to any attorney for the Commonwealth upon the request of that person, without charge to be used only in the performance of his official duties.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 46-411, 46-412; 1958, c. 550; 1968, c. 760; 1985, c. 10.

§ 52-4.3.
Drug Investigation Special Trust Account.

There is hereby created in the Department of the Treasury a special nonreverting fund to be known as the Drug Investigation Special Trust Account, consisting of such funds as may be appropriated by the General Assembly from time to time and all interest, dividends and appreciation, including payments to the fund from the federal government by virtue of a grant, gift, forfeiture or other disposition, which may accrue to such fund, for the purpose of providing a timely supplemental source of money to the Department of State Police for use in the detection, investigation and apprehension of persons for the violation of the laws pertaining to the manufacture, sale or distribution of illegal drugs.

Funds from the Drug Investigation Special Trust Account shall be used to supplement general appropriations for the Department of State Police Bureau of Criminal Investigations and a division for drug law enforcement and investigation for nonpersonal service expenditures related to illegal drug investigations. They shall be used only for the purposes stated in subsection A and in strict conformity with the rules and regulations promulgated by the Superintendent of State Police to carry out the intent and purposes of this section.

No expenditures shall be made from the Drug Investigation Trust Account except in strict compliance with procedures established by the Superintendent of State Police and approved by the State Comptroller. The accounting for all such expenditures shall also be in strict compliance with such procedures.

The Drug Investigation Special Trust Account shall be established on the books of the Comptroller so as to segregate the amounts appropriated to the account and the amounts earned or accumulated by such special trust account. No portion of such special trust account shall be used for a purpose other than for drug investigations. Funds remaining in the Drug Investigation Special Trust Account at the end of a biennium shall not revert to the general fund but shall remain in the special trust account, to be used for the purposes set forth in subsections A through C and shall accumulate interest and dividends throughout the existence of the special trust account. Any funds, however, remaining in the special trust account at the end of a biennium in excess of $1,500,000 shall revert to the general fund.

History.

1972, c. 320; 1982, c. 431; 1989, c. 168; 2000, cc. 560, 600.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, c. 1289, as amended by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 552, Item 425 E 1, effective for the biennium ending June 30, 2022, provides: “Notwithstanding the provisions of §§

19.2-386.14

,

38.2-415

,

46.2-1167

and

52-4.3

, Code of Virginia, the Department of State Police may use revenue from the State Asset Forfeiture Fund, the Insurance Fraud Fund, the Drug Investigation Trust Account — State, and the Safety Fund to modify, enhance or procure automated systems that focus on the Commonwealth’s law enforcement activities and information gathering processes.”

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendments by cc. 560 and 600 are identical, and inserted “a division for drug law enforcement and investigation” in the first sentence of subsection B.

§ 52-4.4.
Duties relating to criminal history record information checks required by licensed firearms dealers.

The Superintendent of the Department of State Police shall establish a toll-free telephone number which shall be operational seven days a week between the hours of 8:00 a.m. and 10:00 p.m., except December 25, for purposes of responding to inquiries from licensed firearms dealers, as such term is defined in 18 U.S.C. § 921 et seq., pursuant to the provisions of §

18.2-308.2:2

. The Department shall hire and train such personnel as are necessary to administer the provisions of this section.

History.

1989, c. 745; 1997, c. 341.

The 1997 amendment

inserted “except December 25” preceding “for purposes” in the first sentence.

§ 52-4.5.
(Effective until July 2, 2026) Facial recognition technology; authorized uses; Department to establish a State Police Model Facial Recognition Technology Policy; penalty.

For purposes of this section:

“Authorized use” means the use of facial recognition technology to (i) help identify an individual when there is a reasonable suspicion the individual has committed a crime; (ii) help identify a crime victim, including a victim of online sexual abuse material; (iii) help identify a person who may be a missing person or witness to criminal activity; (iv) help identify a victim of human trafficking or an individual involved in the trafficking of humans, weapons, drugs, or wildlife; (v) help identify an online recruiter of criminal activity, including but not limited to human, weapon, drug, and wildlife trafficking; (vi) help a person who is suffering from a mental or physical disability impairing his ability to communicate and be understood; (vii) help identify a deceased person; (viii) help identify a person who is incapacitated or otherwise unable to identify himself; (ix) help identify a person who is reasonably believed to be a danger to himself or others; (x) help identify an individual lawfully detained; (xi) help mitigate an imminent threat to public safety, a significant threat to life, or a threat to national security, including acts of terrorism; (xii) ensure officer safety as part of the vetting of undercover law enforcement; (xiii) determine whether an individual may have unlawfully obtained one or more state driver’s licenses, financial instruments, or other official forms of identification using information that is fictitious or associated with a victim of identity theft; or (xiv) help identify a person who an officer reasonably believes is concealing his true identity and about whom the officer has a reasonable suspicion has committed a crime other than concealing his identity.

“Facial recognition technology” means an electronic system or service for conducting an algorithmic comparison of images of a person’s facial features for the purpose of identification. “Facial recognition technology” does not include the use of automated or semi-automated process to redact a recording in order to protect the privacy of a subject depicted in the recording prior to release or disclosure of the recording outside of the law-enforcement agency if the process does not generate or result in the retention of any biometric data or surveillance information.

“Publicly post” means to post on a website that is maintained by the entity or on any other website on which the entity generally posts information and that is available to the public or that clearly describes how the public may access such data.

Pursuant to §

2.2-1112

, the Division of Purchases and Supply (the Division) shall determine the appropriate facial recognition technology for use in accordance with this section. The Division shall not approve any facial recognition technology unless it has been evaluated by the National Institute of Standards and Technology (NIST) as part of the Face Recognition Vendor Test. Any facial recognition technology utilized shall utilize algorithms that have demonstrated (i) an accuracy score of at least 98 percent true positives within one or more datasets relevant to the application in a NIST Face Recognition Vendor Test report and (ii) minimal performance variations across demographics associated with race, skin tone, ethnicity, or gender. The Division shall require all approved vendors to annually provide independent assessments and benchmarks offered by NIST to confirm continued compliance with this section.

The Department shall create a model policy regarding the use of facial recognition technology, which shall be known as the State Police Model Facial Recognition Technology Policy, and shall, as a part of such model policy, administer protocols for handling requests for assistance in the use of facial recognition technology made to the Department by local law-enforcement agencies and campus police departments. The Department shall publicly post such policy no later than January 1, 2023, and such policy shall be updated annually thereafter and shall include:

Requirements for training facilitated through the Department, including the nature and frequency of specialized training required for an individual to be authorized by a law-enforcement agency to utilize facial recognition technology as authorized by this section;

The extent to which a law-enforcement agency shall document (i) instances when facial recognition technology is used for authorized purposes and (ii) how long such information is retained;

Procedures for the confirmation of any initial findings generated by facial recognition technology by a secondary examiner; and

Promulgation of standing orders, policies, or public materials by law-enforcement agencies that use facial recognition technology.

The Department may use facial recognition technology for authorized uses. A match made through facial recognition technology shall not be included in an affidavit to establish probable cause for purposes of issuance of a search warrant or an arrest warrant but shall be admissible as exculpatory evidence. The Department shall not (i) use facial recognition technology for tracking the movements of an identified individual in a public space in real time; (ii) create a database of images using a live video feed for the purpose of using facial recognition technology; or (iii) enroll a comparison image in a commercial image repository of a facial recognition technology service provider except pursuant to an authorized use. Following such use as provided in clause (iii), no comparison image may be retained or used further by the service provider except as required for auditing that use or as may be otherwise required by law.

The Department shall maintain records regarding its use of facial recognition technology. Such records shall be sufficient to facilitate discovery in criminal proceedings, post-conviction proceedings, public reporting, and auditing of compliance with the Department’s policy. The Department shall collect data pertaining to (i) a complete history of each user’s queries; (ii) the total number of queries conducted; (iii) the number of queries that resulted in a list of possible candidates; (iv) how many times an examiner offered the Department an investigative lead based on his findings; (v) how many cases were closed due to an investigative lead from facial recognition technology; (vi) what types of criminal offenses are being investigated; (vii) the nature of the image repository being compared or queried; (viii) demographic information for the individuals whose images are queried; and (ix) if applicable, any other entities with which the Department shared facial recognition data.

The Superintendent shall publicly post and annually update a report by April 1 each year to provide information to the public regarding the Department’s use of facial recognition technology. The report shall include all data required by clauses (ii) through (viii) of subsection E in addition to (i) all instances of unauthorized access of the facial recognition technology, including any unauthorized access by employees of the Department; (ii) vendor information, including the specific algorithms employed; and (iii) if applicable, data or links related to third-party testing of such algorithms, including any reference to variations in demographic performance. If any information or data (a) contains an articulable concern for any person’s safety; (b) is otherwise prohibited from public disclosure by federal or state statute; or (c) if disclosed, may compromise sensitive criminal justice information, such information or data may be excluded from public disclosure. Nothing herein shall limit disclosure of data collected pursuant to subsection E when such disclosure is related to a writ of habeas corpus.

For purposes of this subsection, “sensitive criminal justice information” means information related to (1) a particular ongoing criminal investigation or proceeding, (2) the identity of a confidential source, or (3) law-enforcement investigative techniques and procedures.

Any facial recognition technology operator employed by the Department who (i) violates the Department’s policy for the use of facial recognition technology or (ii) conducts a search for any reason other than an authorized use is guilty of a Class 3 misdemeanor and shall be required to complete training on the Department’s policy on and authorized uses of facial recognition technology before being reinstated to operate such facial recognition technology. The Department shall terminate from employment any facial recognition technology operator who violates clause (i) or (ii) for a second time. A facial recognition technology operator who commits a second or subsequent violation of this subsection is guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.

2022, c. 737.

Editor's note.

Acts 2022, c. 737, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall expire on July 1, 2026.”

§ 52-5.
Repealed by Acts 1978, c. 470.

§ 52-6.
Appointment of additional police officers.

The Superintendent of State Police, with the approval of the Governor, shall have authority to appoint additional police officers, who may or may not be residents of this Commonwealth, to serve for specified periods of time. The police officers so appointed shall receive such compensation as the Superintendent shall approve. Such police officers shall have the same powers and perform the same duties as the regular police officers appointed by the Superintendent.

History.

1932, p. 618; Michie Code 1942, § 2154(54); R. P. 1948, §

52-6

; 1985, c. 272.

§ 52-6.1.
Appointment of supervisory officers.

All appointments to sworn police positions above the rank of trooper within the Department of State Police shall be made by the Superintendent of State Police from among the sworn police officers of the Department, except for those positions designated in subdivision A 20 of §

2.2-2905

, or whenever the Superintendent determines, in writing, that a position requires knowledge, skills, or abilities such that a sufficient pool of qualified candidates does not exist within the Department of State Police.
It was and is the intent of the General Assembly that the primary factor in the career progression program is satisfactory years of service.

History.

1993, c. 766.

Editor’s note.

At the direction of the Code Commission, substituted “subdivision A 20 of §

2.2-2905

” for “subdivision A 16 of §

2.2-2905

.”

The reference to “subdivision A 16 of §

2.2-2905

” appears to be incorrect. In Acts 1993, c. 766 the reference was to “subdivision A 16 of § 2.1-116.” However, Acts 1995, c. 757, deleted subdivision A 16 of § 2.1-116.

§ 52-7.
Bonds of police officers; liability insurance policies.

All police officers appointed by the Superintendent of State Police, and engaged in the enforcement of criminal laws and the laws relating to the operation of motor vehicles upon the roads and highways of this Commonwealth, shall, before entering upon or continuing in their duties, enter into bond, with some solvent guaranty company authorized to do business in this Commonwealth, as surety, in the penalty of $75,000 and with condition for the faithful and lawful performance of their duties. Such bonds shall be filed in the office of the Department of State Police, and the premiums thereon shall be paid out of the funds appropriated for the maintenance and operation of the Department of State Police. All persons injured or damaged in any manner by the unlawful, negligent or improper conduct of any such officer while on duty may maintain an action upon such bond.

In lieu of posting bond as provided herein, any such police officer may furnish an adequate liability insurance policy as proof of his ability to respond in damages, which may be adjudged against him in favor of any person or persons injured or damaged in any manner resulting from his unlawful, negligent or improper conduct while on official duty, to the amount set forth above. The premiums on any such insurance policy or policies shall be paid out of the funds appropriated for the maintenance and operation of the Department of State Police.

All such bonds and insurance policies shall be approved by the Superintendent of State Police.

History.

1926, p. 941; 1940, p. 473; Michie Code 1942, § 2154(51a); R. P. 1948, §

52-7

; 1950, p. 150; 1966, c. 213; 1968, c. 492.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

15 M.J. Public Officers, § 15.

§ 52-8.
Powers and duties to enforce criminal laws and investigate aircraft accidents.

The Superintendent of State Police, his several assistants and police officers appointed by him are vested with the powers of a sheriff for the purpose of enforcing all the criminal laws of this Commonwealth and for investigating any aircraft accident which occurs in the Commonwealth, and it shall be the duty of the Superintendent, his several assistants and police officers appointed by him to use their best efforts to enforce the same.

Nothing in this section shall be construed as relieving any sheriff or sergeant, commissioner of the revenue, police officer, or any other official now or hereafter invested with police powers and duties, state or local, from the duty of aiding and assisting in the enforcement of such laws within the scope of his authority and duty.

History.

1932, p. 617; 1934, p. 277; Michie Code 1942, § 2154(53); 1944, p. 204; R. P. 1948, §

52-8

; 1968, c. 737.

Cross references.

As to employment, jurisdiction, and power of special police officers, see §

62.1-132.12

.

Law Review.

For note, “Law of Arrest in Virginia,” see 21 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 249 (1964).

§ 52-8.1.
Powers and duties of Bureau of Criminal Investigation.

In addition to any other powers and duties which may be provided by statute or otherwise, the Bureau of Criminal Investigation shall conduct an investigation into any matter referred to it by the Governor. The Bureau of Criminal Investigation shall, when requested by the Attorney General, any sheriff, chief of police, attorney for the Commonwealth or grand jury, conduct an investigation into the subject matter so directed or requested, if the person or grand jury making the request has reasonable cause to believe the acts committed or about to be committed would constitute a Class 1, 2 or 3 felony, to determine whether any such criminal violations have occurred, are occurring or are about to occur. The Bureau may, in all other requests for investigations made by the Attorney General, any sheriff, chief of police, attorney for the Commonwealth or grand jury, conduct an investigation into the subject matter so requested, to determine whether any criminal violations have occurred, are occurring or are about to occur.

History.

1974, c. 483; 1975, c. 650; 1980, c. 232.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 1, 2 or 3 felonies, see §

18.2-10

.

§ 52-8.1:1.
Powers and duties of a drug law enforcement and investigation division.

In addition to any other powers and duties which may be provided by statute or otherwise, it shall be the duty of a division for drug law enforcement and investigation to enforce the laws of the Commonwealth and conduct investigations related to violations of Articles 1 (§

18.2-247

et seq.) and 1.1 (§

18.2-265.1

et seq.) of Chapter 7 of Title 18.2 or when requested pursuant to the provisions of §

52-8.1

.

The Superintendent may request and receive, from any federal, state or local agency, cooperation and assistance to aid such division in the performance of its duties, including temporary assignment of personnel which may be necessary to carry out the performance of its functions; provided that the agency consents to the assignment. Consent may not be unreasonably withheld. Any assistance or appropriation given to such division shall be used for the primary purpose of enforcing laws and conducting investigations related to violations of Articles 1 (§

18.2-247

et seq.) and 1.1 (§

18.2-265.1

et seq.) of Chapter 7 of Title 18.2. Such division shall be a party to any anti-crime partnership agreement established pursuant to §

2.2-117

and may assist any locality declared an Intensified Drug Enforcement Jurisdiction pursuant to §

15.2-1715

.

Such division may enter into agreements with other states pertaining to the enforcement of Articles 1 (§

18.2-247

et seq.) and 1.1 (§

18.2-265.1

et seq.) of Chapter 7 of Title 18.2 across state boundaries. Such division may share information with law-enforcement agencies in other states as is necessary to carry out its work.

History.

2000, cc. 560, 600.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, c. 1289, as amended by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 552, Item 426 D, effective for the biennium ending June 30, 2022, provides: “The Department of State Police shall modify the implementation of the division of drug law enforcement established pursuant to §

52-8.1:1

, Code of Virginia, and shall redirect, as may be necessary, resources heretofore provided for that purpose by the General Assembly for the purposes of homeland security, the gathering of intelligence on terrorist activities, the preparation for response to a terrorist attack and any other activity determined by the Governor to be crucial to strengthening the preparedness of the Commonwealth against the threat of natural disasters and emergencies. Nothing in this Item shall be construed to prohibit the Department of State Police from performing drug law enforcement or investigation as otherwise provided for by the Code of Virginia.”

§ 52-8.2.
Certain investigations of elected officials; immunity for witnesses.

No investigation of an elected official of the Commonwealth or any political subdivision to determine whether a criminal violation has occurred, is occurring or is about to occur under the provisions of §

52-8.1

shall be initiated, undertaken or continued except upon the request of the Governor, Attorney General or a grand jury.

In any grand jury proceeding or criminal prosecution involving a person who was at the time of the offense an elected official of the Commonwealth or a political subdivision thereof resulting from an investigation under subsection A, any witness called by the court or attorney for the Commonwealth and required to give evidence for the prosecution who refuses to testify or produce evidence by expressly invoking his right not to incriminate himself may be compelled to testify or produce evidence by the presiding judge. A witness who refuses to testify or produce evidence after being ordered to do so by the presiding judge may be held in contempt and may be incarcerated until the contempt is purged by compliance with the order. When a witness is compelled to testify or produce evidence after expressly invoking his right not to incriminate himself, and the presiding judge has determined that the assertion of the right is bona fide, the compelled testimony, or any information directly or indirectly derived from such testimony or other information, shall not be used against the witness in any criminal proceeding except a prosecution for perjury.

History.

1977, c. 331; 1991, c. 675.

Cross references.

As to state agencies, courts, and local constitutional officers reporting certain fraudulent transactions, see § 30-138.

§ 52-8.3.
Disclosure of criminal investigative records and reports; penalty.

Any person employed by a law-enforcement agency or other governmental agency within the Commonwealth who has or has had access in an official capacity to an official written record or report submitted in confidence to the Department of State Police relating to an ongoing criminal investigation, and who uses or knowingly permits another to use such record or report for any purpose not consistent with the record exclusions permitted in the Virginia Freedom of Information Act (§

2.2-3700

et seq.), or other provision of state law, shall be guilty of a Class 2 misdemeanor.

The provisions of this section shall not be construed to impede or prohibit full access to information concerning the existence of any criminal investigation or to other verbal disclosures permitted by state police operating procedures.

History.

1981, c. 238; 1999, cc. 703, 726; 2004, c. 690.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 2 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

The 1999 amendments.

The 1999 amendments by cc. 703 and 726 are identical, and substituted “exclusions permitted in §§ 2.1-342.01 and 2.1-342.2” for “exemptions permitted in § 2.1-342” in the first paragraph.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 690 substituted “record exclusions permitted in the Virginia Freedom of Information Act (§

2.2-3700

et seq.)” for “exclusions permitted in §§

2.2-3705

and

2.2-3706

.”

§ 52-8.4.
Powers and duties to promulgate regulations; inspection of certain records.

The Superintendent of State Police, with the cooperation of such other agencies of the Commonwealth as may be necessary, shall promulgate regulations pertaining to commercial motor vehicle safety pursuant to the United States Motor Carrier Act of 1984. These regulations shall set forth criteria relating to driver, vehicle, and cargo safety inspections with which motor carriers and transport vehicles shall comply, and shall be no more restrictive than the applicable provisions of the Federal Motor Carrier Safety Regulations of the United States Department of Transportation. These regulations shall not apply to hours worked by any carrier when transporting passengers or property to or from any portion of the Commonwealth for the purpose of (i) providing relief or assistance in case of earthquake, flood, fire, famine, drought, epidemic, pestilence, or other calamity or disaster or (ii) engaging in the provision or restoration of utility services when the loss of such service is unexpected, unplanned or unscheduled. The suspension of the regulation provided for in this subsection shall expire if the Secretary of the United States Department of Transportation determines that it is in conflict with the intent of Federal Motor Carrier Safety Regulations.

For the purposes of this section:“Commercial motor vehicle” means any self-propelled or towed vehicle used on the highways in commerce to transport passengers or property if such vehicle (i) has a gross vehicle weight rating or gross combination weight rating, or gross vehicle weight or gross combination weight, whichever is greater, of more than 10,000 pounds when operated interstate or more than 26,000 pounds when operated intrastate, (ii) is designed or used to transport more than 15 passengers, including the driver, regardless of weight, or (iii) is used to transport hazardous materials in a quantity requiring placards by regulations issued under authority of Article 7 (§ 10.1-1450 et seq.) of Chapter 14 of Title 10.1.“Motor carrier” means a common carrier by motor vehicle, a contract carrier by motor vehicle, or a private carrier of property or passengers by motor vehicle. This term also encompasses any agent, officer, representative, or employee who is responsible for the hiring, supervision, training, assignment, or dispatching of drivers.“Transport vehicle” means any vehicle owned or leased by a motor carrier used in the transportation of goods or persons.“Safety inspection” means the detailed examination of a vehicle for compliance with safety regulations promulgated under this section and includes a determination of the qualifications of the driver and his hours of service.

Except for those offenses listed in §

52-8.4:2

, any violation of the provisions of the regulations adopted pursuant to this section shall constitute a traffic infraction punishable by a fine of not more than $1,000 for the first offense or by a fine of not more than $5,000 for a subsequent offense. Each day of violation shall constitute a separate offense; however, any violation of any out-of-service order issued under authority of such regulations or under authority of the Federal Motor Carrier Safety regulations shall be punished as provided in §

46.2-341.21

and the disqualification provisions of §

46.2-341.21

also shall apply to any driver so convicted.

The Department of State Police, together with all other law-enforcement officers certified to perform vehicle safety inspections as defined by §

46.2-1001

who have satisfactorily completed 40 hours of on-the-job training and a course of instruction as prescribed by the U.S. Department of Transportation, Federal Motor Carrier Safety Administration, in federal motor carrier safety regulations, safety inspection procedures, and out-of-service criteria, shall enforce the regulations and other requirements promulgated pursuant to this section. Those law-enforcement officers certified to enforce the regulations and other requirements promulgated pursuant to this section shall annually receive in-service training in current federal motor carrier safety regulations, safety inspection procedures, and out-of-service criteria.

Any records required to be maintained by motor carriers pursuant to regulations promulgated by the Superintendent under the authority of subsection A of this section shall be open to inspection during a carrier’s normal business hours by specially trained members of the Department of State Police specifically designated by the Superintendent. Members of the Department of State Police designated for that purpose by the Superintendent shall also be authorized, with the consent of the owner, operator, or agent in charge or with an appropriate warrant obtained under the procedure prescribed in Chapter 24 (§

19.2-393

et seq.) of Title 19.2, to go upon the property of motor carriers to verify the accuracy of maintenance records by an inspection of the vehicles to which those records relate.Any person holding a valid commercial driver’s license shall be exempt from the hours of service of drivers provisions as defined in regulations promulgated by the Federal Motor Carrier Safety Administration (49 C.F.R. Part 395) while operating a commercial motor vehicle during planting and harvest periods to transport:

Agricultural commodities from the source of the agricultural commodities to a location within 150 air miles (176.2 miles) from the source;

Farm supplies for agricultural purposes from a wholesale or retail distribution point of the farm supplies to a farm or other location where the farm supplies are intended to be used within a 150-air-mile radius (176.2 miles) from the distribution point; or

Farm supplies for agricultural purposes from a wholesale distribution point of the farm supplies to a retail distribution point of the farm supplies within a 150-air-mile radius (176.2 miles) from the wholesale distribution point.

History.

1986, c. 640; 1988, cc. 14, 718; 1990, cc. 24, 870; 1991, cc. 382, 505; 1993, c. 108; 1994, c. 71; 1995, cc. 145, 151, 744, 803; 1996, c. 302; 1997, c. 283; 2002, c. 828; 2004, c. 23; 2015, c. 258.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1999, c. 845, relating to sex offender registration and community notification, provides in cl. 2: “That the Virginia Department of State Police shall promulgate such regulations as are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act.”

The 1997 amendment

inserted “Except for those offenses listed in §

52-8.4:2

” at the beginning of subsection C.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 828, in subsection B, inserted “or gross vehicle weight or gross combination weight, whichever is greater” and “or used” in the definition of “commercial motor vehicle”; and substituted “Motor Carrier Safety Administration” for “Highway Administration, Office of Motor Carriers” in subsection D.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 23, effective March 2, 2004, in the third sentence of subsection A, inserted the (i) designation preceding “providing relief or assistance,” deleted “major loss of utility services” preceding “or other calamity,” and added clause (ii); substituted “15” for “fifteen” in the definition of “commercial motor vehicle” of subsection B; and substituted “40” for “forty” in the first sentence of subsection D.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 258 added the last paragraph with subdivisions 1 through 3 in subsection E.

§ 52-8.4:1.
Regulations for firearms shows.

The Superintendent of State Police shall provide a form for use by promoters of firearms shows for the purpose of notifying the State Police and the chief of police, or the sheriff in localities without police departments, of their intent to conduct a firearms show pursuant to §

54.1-4201.1

.

History.

1993, c. 477.